Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5785XS (4) 91 th/ns S.F. 2082 Section 1. Section 321J.5, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The operator has been involved in a motor vehicle 3 collision resulting in injury or death . 4 Sec. 2. Section 321J.6, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 5 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 b. The person has been involved in a motor vehicle accident 7 or collision resulting in personal injury or death . 8 Sec. 3. Section 321J.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. A person who operates a motor vehicle 11 in this state and who was involved in a motor vehicle accident 12 or collision resulting in death is deemed to have given consent 13 to the withdrawal of specimens of the personâs blood, breath, 14 or urine and to a chemical test or tests of the specimens 15 for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or 16 presence of a controlled substance or other drugs, subject to 17 this section. 18 Sec. 4. Section 321J.9, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 19 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 If a person refuses to submit to the chemical testing, a test 21 shall not be given, but the department, upon the receipt of the 22 peace officerâs certification, subject to penalty for perjury, 23 that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person 24 to have been operating a motor vehicle in violation of section 25 321J.2 or 321J.2A , if applicable, that specified conditions 26 existed for chemical testing pursuant to section 321J.6 , and 27 that the person refused to submit to the chemical testing, 28 shall revoke the personâs driverâs license and any nonresident 29 operating privilege for the following periods of time: 30 Sec. 5. Section 321J.12, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 31 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 32 Upon certification, subject to penalty for perjury, by 33 the peace officer that there existed reasonable grounds to 34 believe that the person had been operating a motor vehicle in 35 -1- LSB 5785XS (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 S.F. 2082 violation of section 321J.2 , if applicable, that there existed 1 one or more of the necessary conditions for chemical testing 2 described in section 321J.6, subsection 1 or 1A , and that the 3 person submitted to chemical testing and the test results 4 indicated the presence of a controlled substance or other drug, 5 or an alcohol concentration equal to or in excess of the level 6 prohibited by section 321J.2 , or a combination of alcohol and 7 another drug in violation of section 321J.2 , the department 8 shall revoke the personâs driverâs license or nonresident 9 operating privilege for the following periods of time: 10 Sec. 6. Section 321J.12, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 5. Upon certification, subject to penalty of perjury, by 13 the peace officer that there existed reasonable grounds to 14 believe that the person had been operating a motor vehicle in 15 violation of section 321J.2A , if applicable, that there existed 16 one or more of the necessary conditions for chemical testing 17 described in section 321J.6, subsection 1 or 1A , and that the 18 person submitted to chemical testing and the test results 19 indicated an alcohol concentration of .02 or more but less 20 than .08, the department shall revoke the personâs driverâs 21 license or operating privilege for a period of sixty days if 22 the person has had no previous revocation under this chapter , 23 and for a period of ninety days if the person has had a previous 24 revocation under this chapter . 25 Sec. 7. Section 321J.13, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 26 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 27 The department shall grant the person an opportunity to be 28 heard within forty-five days of receipt of a request for a 29 hearing if the request is made not later than ten days after 30 receipt of notice of revocation served pursuant to section 31 321J.9 or 321J.12 . The hearing shall be before the department 32 in the county where the alleged events occurred, unless the 33 director and the person agree that the hearing may be held in 34 some other county, or the hearing may be held by telephone 35 -2- LSB 5785XS (4) 91 th/ns 2/ 4 S.F. 2082 conference at the discretion of the agency conducting the 1 hearing. The hearing may be recorded and its scope shall be 2 limited to the issues of whether a peace officer had reasonable 3 grounds to believe that the person was operating a motor 4 vehicle in violation of section 321J.2 or 321J.2A , if required, 5 and one or more of the following: 6 Sec. 8. Section 321J.13, subsection 6, paragraph b, 7 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 (1) That the peace officer did not have reasonable grounds 9 to believe that a violation of section 321J.2 or 321J.2A had 10 occurred to support a request for or to administer a chemical 11 test , if required under the circumstances . 12